District of Columbia statutes.
38-771.05

Right to administrative review.

Any person aggrieved by a final decision or order of OSSE imposing sanctions following a determination by OSSE that a violation of this chapter has occurred may obtain a review of the final decision or order in accordance with regulations issued by the Mayor pursuant to § 38-771.06 or the process set forth in § 38-771.07, whichever is applicable; provided, that if the aggrieved party is a member of a collective bargaining unit, he or she may choose between the negotiated grievance process set forth in a collective bargaining agreement and the grievance process set forth in § 38-771.07 or in regulations issued by the Mayor pursuant to § 38-771.06, whichever is applicable.

History

Oct. 17, 2013, D.C. Law 20-27, § 105, 60 DCR 11120